Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1116
Average per pupil cost of the service agency, defined.

Average per pupil cost of the service agency means the amount computed by dividing the total operating expenditure of the preceding year, excluding the cost of sectarian instruction, of the service agency by its preceding year's average daily membership.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3306;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 798;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 10.